Maryland, session 2026, HB1349.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) The Public Service Commission shall develop an implementation plan to
convert formerly operational fossil fuel generating stations located in the State to natural
gas generating stations.
(b) In developing the implementation plan, the Commission shall conduct a public
stakeholder process to solicit input, including soliciting input from:
(1) the Office of People’s Counsel;
(2) the Maryland Energy Administration;
(3) the Department of Natural Resources;
(4) the Department of the Environment;
(5) investor–owned electric and gas companies, electric cooperatives, and
municipal electric utilities;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1349*

HOUSE BILL 1349
(6) owners of generating stations and natural gas transmission systems
located in the State;
(7) nonprofit advocacy organizations with relevant expertise; and
(8) local governments with formerly operational fossil fuel generating
stations located in their jurisdictions.
(c) The implementation plan shall include, with respect to converting formerly
operational fossil fuel generating stations located in the State to natural gas generating
stations:
(1) an assessment of the feasibility and associated costs, including the
feasibility and associated costs of:
(i) an electric company or gas company taking ownership of the
generating stations; and
(ii) a person that is not an electric company or gas company taking
ownership of the generating stations;
(2) a description of any legal, regulatory, and engineering barriers and
their potential solutions;
(3) a conversion timeline that balances ratepayer costs with electric system
reliability;
(4) any draft legislation necessary for implementation; and
(5) any other relevant matter, as determined by the Commission.
(d) On or before January 1, 2027, the Commission shall provide its
implementation plan and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, the Senate Committee on Education, Energy, and
the Environment and the House Environment and Transportation Committee.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.